Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-1,105
Grain moisture measuring devices; make comparative tests.

The supervisor of the grain warehouse department of the Public Service Commission, or his or her inspectors, shall inspect, make comparative tests of, and ascertain if correct, every grain moisture measuring device used or employed in this state by any proprietor or agent, lessee, or employee thereof in proving or ascertaining the moisture and test weight of grain offered for storage or sale, sold, or purchased or in the process of being purchased. Such inspector shall use as a standard for making such comparative tests a grain moisture measuring device meeting the tolerances and specifications established pursuant to section 89-1,104.

Laws 1978, LB 636, § 2;

Laws 2005, LB 52, § 7.